Utah statutes.
16-10a-128.   Certificates issued by the division.
(1)  Anyone may apply to the division for a certificate of existence for a
domestic corporation, a certificate of authorization for a foreign
corporation, or a certificate that sets forth any facts of record in the
office of the division.
(2)  A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:
(a)  the domestic corporation's corporate name or the foreign corporation's
corporate name registered in this state;
(b)  that:
(i)  the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state
and the date of its incorporation; or
(ii)  the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this
state;
(c)  that all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid,
if:
(i)  payment is reflected in the records of the division; and
(ii)  nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or
foreign corporation;
(d)  that its most recent annual report required by Section 16-10a-1607 has
been filed by the division;
(e)  that articles of dissolution have not been filed; and
(f)  other facts of record in the office of the division that may be requested
by the applicant.
(3)  Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate
issued by the division may be relied upon as conclusive evidence of the facts
set forth in the certificate.
